Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. OPEN GOVERNMENT; ETHICS

SUBTITLE B. ETHICS

CHAPTER 576. PROHIBITION ON APPROPRIATION OF MONEY TO SETTLE OR PAY SEXUAL HARASSMENT CLAIMS

Sec. 576.0001. PROHIBITION ON APPROPRIATION OF MONEY TO SETTLE OR PAY SEXUAL HARASSMENT CLAIMS. The legislature may not appropriate money and a state agency may not use appropriated money to settle or otherwise pay a sexual harassment claim made against a person who:

(1) is an elected member of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government;

(2) is appointed by the governor to serve as a member of a department, commission, board, or other public office within the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government; or

(3) serves as staff for a person described by Subdivision (1) or (2).

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 551 (S.B. 282), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.